California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) The program may apportion the clinical training among multiple clinical laboratories in any percentage as long as the total training meets the requirements established by the department.

(2) Each clinical laboratory has been approved by the department as part of the program in accordance with regulations. The program shall notify the department in writing within 30 days of a change in clinical laboratories used by the program to provide training.

(3) The director of the approved program shall be responsible for notifying the department in advance of the start and end date of training for each trainee.
 The program shall coordinate with the department in meeting established requirements.

(4) The director of the approved program shall ensure that all of the department’s requirements for training and affiliation are met.

(5) The program has submitted an application on forms provided by the department for approval.

(c) The department shall establish by regulation the ratio of licensed clinical
 laboratory scientists to licensed trainees on the staff of the clinical laboratory and the minimum requirements for training in any specialty or in the entire field of clinical laboratory science or practice. Application for approval shall be made on forms provided by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 352, Sec. 2.   (SB 289)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1223.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the public policy of the state to ensure that California’s laboratory standards, including its laboratory personnel standards, be sustained in order to provide accurate, reliable, and necessary test results. The Legislature further finds that inspections are the most effective means of furthering this policy. It is not the intent of the Legislature to reduce in any way the resources available to the department for inspections, but rather to provide the department with the greatest flexibility to concentrate its resources where they can be most effective. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for an inspection process that includes state-based inspection components and that determines compliance with federal and state requirements
 for clinical laboratories.

(b) The department shall employ, or contract for, inspectors, special agents, and investigators, and provide any clerical and technical assistance as necessary to administer this chapter and may incur other expenses as necessary.

(c) Laboratories accredited by a private, nonprofit organization shall be deemed by the department to meet state licensure or registration requirements, and shall be issued a certificate of that deemed status by the department, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The private, nonprofit organization meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Is approved by the federal Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services as an accreditation body under CLIA and provides the department with
 the following information:

(i) A detailed comparison of the individual accreditation or approval requirements, with the comparable condition-level requirements.

(ii) A detailed description of its inspection process, including all of the following:

(I) Frequency of inspections.

(II) Copies of inspection forms.

(III) Instructions and guidelines.

(IV) A description of the review and decisionmaking process of inspections.

(V) A statement concerning whether inspections are announced or unannounced.

(VI) A description of the steps taken to monitor the correction of deficiencies.

(iii) A description of the process for monitoring proficiency testing performance, including action to be taken in response to unsuccessful participation.

(iv) A list of all of its current California licensed or registered laboratories and the expiration date of their accreditation, licensure, or registration, as applicable. 

(B) Is approved by the department as having accreditation standards that are equal to, or more stringent than, state requirements for licensure and registration.

(C) Conducts inspections of clinical laboratories in a manner that will determine compliance with federal standards and California laws to the extent that California laws provide
 greater protection to residents, or are more stringent than federal standards, as determined by the department. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may, without taking regulatory action pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, implement or interpret this section by means of an All Clinical Laboratories Letter (ACLL). The department shall post the ACLL on its Internet Web site so that any person may observe which California laws are more stringent than federal standards, and which accreditation bodies have been approved to conduct inspections. Public comment on the ACLL shall be accepted by the department for 30 days after posting and shall become final 45 days after the posting. Comments received shall be considered by the department. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to change existing statutory or regulatory requirements governing the operation of clinical laboratories or their personnel.

(D) Is approved by the department as meeting the requirements of this paragraph. The department shall begin accepting applications for approval, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, by January 1, 2011. The department shall make a determination on an application submitted pursuant to this subparagraph within 180 days of receiving the application.

(2) The laboratory meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Meets the accreditation standards of the private, nonprofit organization.

(B) Agrees to permit the private, nonprofit organization to provide any records or other information to the department, its agents, or contractors, as the department may require.

(C) Pays the
 applicable fees required under Section 1300.

(D) Authorizes its proficiency testing organization to furnish to the department and the private, nonprofit organization the results of the laboratory’s participation in an approved proficiency testing program, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 493.2, for the purpose of monitoring the laboratory’s proficiency testing, along with explanatory information needed to interpret the proficiency testing results, upon request of the department.

(E) Authorizes the private, nonprofit organization to release to the department a notification of every violation of condition-level requirements, including the actions taken by the organization as a result of the violation, within 30 days of the initiation of the action. 

(F) Authorizes the private, nonprofit organization to give notice to the
 department of any withdrawal of the laboratory’s accreditation.

(d) If the private, nonprofit organization described in subdivision (c) has withdrawn or revoked its accreditation of a laboratory, the laboratory shall retain its certificate of deemed status issued pursuant to subdivision (c) for 45 days after the laboratory receives notice of the withdrawal or revocation of the accreditation, or the effective date of any action taken by the department, whichever is earlier.

(e) A certificate of deemed status issued pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be renewed annually provided that the conditions for issuance specified in subdivision (c) are still met. Except as authorized
 under subdivision (f), the department shall not conduct routine inspections of a laboratory issued a certificate of deemed status pursuant to subdivision (c). Each application for a certificate of deemed status issued under subdivision (c) and each request for renewal of that certificate shall be accompanied by the fees set forth in Section 1300. The total of those certificate application and renewal fees collected by the department shall be sufficient to cover the cost of issuing the certificate. If the department determines that those certificate fees do not fully support the costs of these activities, it shall report that determination to the Legislature.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the exercise of the department’s authority to conduct complaint investigations, sample validation inspections, or require submission of proficiency testing results to the department to ensure compliance of any clinical laboratory
 with state standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   (SB 744)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1224.

The department may, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt, amend, or repeal any regulations necessary for the administration or enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1224.5.

The department shall conduct a study to determine whether the persons conducting tests in physician office laboratories under paragraph (12) of subdivision (b) of, and paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 1206.5, produce accurate, reliable, and necessary test results comparable to those produced by other persons performing moderate complexity or high complexity testing, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1225.

(a) In order to carry out this chapter, any duly authorized representative of the department may do any of the following:

(1) Enter or inspect on an announced or unannounced basis any building, premise, equipment, materials, records, or information at any reasonable time to secure compliance with, or prevent a violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Inspect, photograph, or copy any records, reports, test results, test specimens, or other information related to the requirements of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(3) Secure any sample, photograph, or other evidence from any building or premise for the purpose of enforcing this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) The department may cooperate with, or assist persons licensed under this chapter, or other qualified persons, in evaluating laboratory procedures and techniques necessary to achieve and maintain high quality performance in clinical laboratories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 927, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1226.

Annually the department may compile and may thereafter publish and sell a directory of persons within the state licensed under the provisions of this chapter who hold unsuspended, unforfeited and unrevoked licenses. The directory may also contain a copy of the provisions of this chapter and regulations relating thereto and such other information as the department may determine advisable.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1227 by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.

Every person or clinical laboratory licensed or registered under this chapter shall report to the department, within 30 days thereof, any change of name or address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.

The department shall appoint a multidisciplinary committee to assist, advise, and make recommendations for the establishment of rules and regulations necessary to insure proper administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and to assist and advise the department in matters concerning examinations for licensees of this chapter. Appointments shall be made from lists of nominees solicited by the department and shall provide adequate and proper representation of all persons affected by this chapter. Subcommittees of the committee may be appointed consisting of committee members and consultants having particular knowledge in a subject area for the purpose of assisting the department on special administrative problems and in making recommendations to the committee for consideration in the establishment of rules and regulations. The terms of office of the members shall be determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of the Chapter [1240. - 1246.7.]

1240.

This chapter does not authorize any person to practice medicine and surgery or to furnish the services of physicians for the practice of medicine and surgery. This chapter does not repeal or in any manner affect any provision of this code relating to the practice of medicine. This chapter does not prohibit the performance of tests not covered in Section 1206.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.

(a) This chapter applies to all clinical laboratories in California or receiving biological specimens originating in California for the purpose of performing a clinical laboratory test or examination, and to all persons performing clinical laboratory tests or examinations or engaging in clinical laboratory practice in California or on biological specimens originating in California, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) This chapter shall not apply to any of the following clinical laboratories, or to persons performing clinical laboratory tests or examinations in any of the following clinical laboratories:

(1) Those owned and operated by the United States of America, or any department, agency, or official thereof acting in his or her official capacity to the extent that the Secretary of the federal Department of Health and Human Services has modified the application of CLIA requirements to those laboratories.

(2) Public health laboratories, as defined in Section 1206.

(3) Those that perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations for forensic purposes only.

(4) Those that perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations for research and teaching purposes only and do not report or use patient-specific results for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of any disease or impairment of, or for the assessment of the
 health of, an individual.

(5) Those that perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations
 certified by the National Institutes on Drug Abuse only for those certified tests or examinations. However, all other clinical laboratory tests or examinations conducted by the laboratory are subject to this chapter.

(6) Those that register with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to subdivision (c) to perform blood glucose testing for the purposes of monitoring a minor child diagnosed with diabetes if the person performing the test has been entrusted with the care and control of the child by the child’s parent or legal guardian and provided that all of the following occur:

(A) The blood glucose monitoring test is performed with a blood glucose monitoring instrument that has been approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for sale over the
 counter to the public without a prescription.

(B) The person has been provided written instructions by the child’s health care provider or an agent of the child’s health care provider in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions on the proper use of the monitoring instrument and the handling of any lancets, test strips, cotton balls, or other items used during the process of conducting a blood glucose test.

(C) The person, receiving written authorization from the minor’s parent or legal guardian, complies with written instructions from the child’s health care provider, or an agent of the child’s health care provider, regarding the performance of the test and the operation of the blood glucose monitoring instrument, including how to determine if the results are within the
 normal or therapeutic range for the child, and any restriction on activities or diet that may be necessary.

(D) The person complies with specific written instructions from the child’s health care provider or an agent of the child’s health care provider regarding the identification of symptoms of hypoglycemia or hyperglycemia, and actions to be taken when results are not within the normal or therapeutic range for the child. The instructions shall also contain the telephone number of the child’s health care provider and the telephone number of the child’s parent or legal guardian.

(E) The person records the results of the blood glucose tests and provides them to the child’s parent or legal guardian on a daily basis.

(F) The person complies with universal precautions when performing the testing and posts a list of the universal precautions in a prominent place within the proximity where the test is conducted.

(7) Those individuals who perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations, approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for sale to the public without a prescription in the form of an over-the-counter test kit, on their own bodies or on their minor children or legal wards.

(8) Those certified emergency medical technicians and licensed paramedics providing basic life support services or advanced life support services as defined in Section 1797.52 of the Health and Safety Code who perform only blood glucose tests that are classified as waived clinical laboratory tests
 under CLIA, if the provider of those services obtains a valid certificate of waiver and complies with all other requirements for the performance of waived clinical laboratory tests under applicable federal regulations.

(9) Those doctors of chiropractic listed on the most current federal Department of Transportation National Registry of Certified Medical Examiners that perform urine specific gravity, urine protein, urine blood, and urine sugar tests as those tests relate to the National Registry of Certified Medical Examiners, as adopted by the United States Department of Transportation, as published by the notice in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 77, Friday, April 20, 2012, on pages 24104 to 24135, inclusive, and pursuant to Section 391.42 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that are classified as waived clinical
 laboratory tests under CLIA for the sole purpose of completing the Department of Motor Vehicles Medical Examination Report, if the doctor of chiropractic obtains a valid certificate of waiver and complies with all other requirements for the performance of waived clinical laboratory tests under applicable federal regulations. If a doctor of chiropractic receives an abnormal finding, the doctor of chiropractic shall refer the applicant to the applicant’s primary care physician.

(c) Any place where blood glucose testing is performed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) shall register by notifying the State Department of Health Care Services in writing no later than 30 days after testing has commenced. Registrants pursuant to this subdivision shall not be required to pay any registration or renewal fees nor shall they be subject
 to routine inspection by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.   (AB 2143)   Effective August 22, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.1.

(a) A primary care clinic, licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, that is operating within a network of primary care clinics, may be issued a license to operate a clinical laboratory pursuant to Section 1265, which authorizes the conduct of clinical laboratory tests and examinations from its network of primary care clinics, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The central laboratory’s sole purpose is performing moderate or high complexity clinical laboratory tests and examinations, or both, for the patients of the clinics in the network.

(2) Prior to performing any tests or examinations, the central laboratory obtains a certificate under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 263a) (CLIA) and a state laboratory license for the appropriate complexity level of clinical laboratory testing pursuant to Section 1265.

(b) For purposes of this section, “network of primary care clinics” means two or more primary care clinics operated by the same nonprofit corporation with the same board of directors and the same corporate officers, and operating under the same procedures and protocols.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.

Any person duly licensed under the provisions of this chapter to perform tests called for in a clinical laboratory may perform skin tests for specific diseases, arterial puncture, venipuncture, or skin puncture for purposes of withdrawing blood or for clinical laboratory test purposes as defined by regulations established by the department and upon specific authorization from any person in accordance with the authority granted under any provisions of law relating to the healing arts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.5.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1241, the department may by regulation authorize laboratory personnel certified pursuant to Section 1246 to perform venipuncture, arterial puncture, or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood or for clinical laboratory test purposes, as defined by regulations established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.6.

(a) Any registered nurse licensed under the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 may perform arterial puncture, venipuncture, or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood or for test purposes upon authorization from any licensed physician and surgeon or any licensed dentist.

(b) Any licensed vocational nurse licensed under the provisions of Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) of Division 2 may perform arterial puncture, venipuncture, or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood or for test purposes upon authorization from any licensed physician and surgeon, or any licensed dentist if prior thereto the licensed vocational nurse has been instructed by a physician and surgeon and has demonstrated competence to the physician and surgeon in the proper procedure to be employed when withdrawing blood, or has satisfactorily completed a prescribed course of instruction approved by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians or has demonstrated competence to the satisfaction of that board.

(c) Any respiratory care practitioner certified under the provisions of Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700) of Division 2 may perform arterial puncture, venipuncture, or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood or for test purposes upon authorization from any licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 759, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1243.

A student regularly matriculated in any college or university accredited by an accrediting agency acceptable to the department, or in any legally chartered school approved by the department for training purposes may perform arterial puncture, venipuncture, or skin puncture as a part of the necessary training program when done under the direct and responsible supervision of a person licensed to perform tests under the provisions of this chapter or a licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1244.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall restrict, limit, or prevent a program of nondiagnostic general health assessment provided that:

(1) The program meets the requirements of Section 1265 and complies with the requirements of CLIA for waived testing.

(2) The purpose of the program is to screen asymptomatic individuals for chronic health disorders and to refer individuals to licensed sources of care as indicated.

(3) The program does not test for human immunodeficiency virus or any reportable disease or condition identified in Section 120130 of the Health and Safety Code or the regulations adopted under that section.

(4) The program utilizes only those devices that comply with all of the following:

(A) Meet all applicable state and federal performance standards pursuant to Section 111245 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Are not adulterated as specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 111250) of Chapter 6 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Are not misbranded as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 111330) of Chapter 6 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) Are not new devices unless they meet the requirements of Section 111550 of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) Are approved as waived tests and are used according to the manufacturer’s instructions.

(5) Blood collection is performed by skin puncture only.

(6) Testing of a urine specimen is performed by the dipstick method only.

(7) Testing is performed on site and reported directly to the person requesting the test.

(8) The program maintains a supervisory committee consisting of, at a minimum, a licensed physician and surgeon and a clinical laboratory scientist licensed pursuant to this code.

(9) The supervisory committee for the program adopts written protocols that shall be followed in the program and that shall contain all of the following:

(A) Provision of written information to individuals to be assessed that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(i) The potential risks and benefits of assessment procedures to be performed in the program.

(ii) The limitations, including the nondiagnostic nature, of assessment examinations of biological specimens performed in the program.

(iii) Information regarding the risk factors or markers targeted by the program.

(iv) The need for followup with licensed sources of care for confirmation, diagnosis, and treatment as appropriate.

(B) Proper use of each device utilized in the program including the operation of analyzers, maintenance of equipment and supplies, and performance of quality control procedures including the determination of both accuracy and reproducibility of measurements in accordance with instructions provided by the manufacturer of the assessment device used.

(C) Proper procedures to be employed when collecting blood, if blood specimens are to be obtained.

(D) Proper procedures to be employed in handling and disposing of all biological specimens to be obtained and material contaminated by those biological specimens. These procedures shall comply with all county and city ordinances for medical waste management and blood-borne pathogen control that apply to the location where the program operates.

(E) Proper procedures to be employed in response to fainting, excessive bleeding, or other medical emergencies.

(F) Documentation that the testing personnel are following the instructions of the instrument’s manufacturer, are trained in the performance of the test, and are competent to perform the testing without supervision.

(G) Reporting of assessment results to the individual being assessed.

(H) Referral and followup to licensed sources of care as indicated.

The written protocols adopted by the supervisory committee shall be maintained for at least one year following completion of the assessment program during which period they shall be subject to review by department personnel and the local health officer or his or her designee, including the public health laboratory director.

(b) If skin puncture to obtain a blood specimen is to be performed in a program of nondiagnostic general health assessment, the individual performing the skin puncture shall be authorized to perform skin puncture under this chapter.

(c) A program of nondiagnostic general health assessment that fails to meet the requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not operate.

(d) For purposes of this section, “skin puncture” means the collection of a blood specimen by the finger prick method only and does not include venipuncture, arterial puncture, or any other procedure for obtaining a blood specimen.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as prohibiting a licensed clinical laboratory from operating a program of nondiagnostic general health assessment provided that the clinical laboratory complies with the requirements of this section.

(f) A program for a health fair providing diagnostic or screening tests is not a nondiagnostic general health assessment program if all of the requirements of this chapter are met, and the laboratory performing the testing is licensed or registered under subdivision (a) of Section 1265. For a test that is not authorized for self-ordering pursuant to Section 1246.5 and that is not for a nondiagnostic general health assessment pursuant to this section, the licensed or registered clinical laboratory participating in the health fair shall assure that the test is ordered on-site only by a person licensed under this division who is authorized under his or her scope of practice to order the test or by a person authorized by that licensee. The results of a test performed at a health fair shall be provided to the test subject along with an explanation of the results.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 450, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1244.1.

Thirty days prior to operating a program of nondiagnostic general health assessment, the entity or person operating that program shall file the following documentation with the local health officer in each county in which the program shall operate:

(a) The location of the program, the type and kind of nondiagnostic general health assessments being conducted, the dates and times of operation of programs, and evidence that the program shall be operated in compliance with Section 1244. 

(b) The local health officer shall be notified in writing of any changes to occur in locations, dates, or times indicated in the documentation required in subdivision (a). The local health officer shall be notified of any changes at least 24 hours prior to the program operating at the different locations, dates, or times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 195, Sec. 5.   Effective July 9, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1244.3.

Responsibility for enforcement of Sections 1244 and 1244.1 shall be with the local health officer or his or her authorized designee, including public health laboratory directors. Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from using any necessary enforcement actions for the protection of the public health and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 195, Sec. 6.   Effective July 9, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1244.4.

Any fee for the filing of documentation and related enforcement activities pursuant to Section 1244, 1244.1, and 1244.3 shall be determined by the local enforcement agency and shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) except that those fees shall be adjusted annually by any annual increase in the California Consumer Price Index as determined pursuant to Section 2212 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. All moneys collected as fees pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the appropriate city, county, or city and county treasury and shall only be expended in carrying out Sections 1244, 1244.1, and 1244.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 195, Sec. 7.   Effective July 9, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.

(a) Any individual may perform a blood gas analysis if all the following conditions exist:

(1) He or she has earned a high school diploma or equivalent, as determined by HCFA pursuant to CLIA.

(2) He or she performs the blood gas analysis in a clinic or a general acute care hospital, as defined respectively in Sections 1202 and 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) He or she has been instructed by a physician and surgeon licensed in this state, who is in charge of a department of pulmonary physiology or clinical pathology in licensed clinics or hospitals, as defined respectively in Sections 1202 and 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, in the proper procedure to be employed when performing a blood gas analysis.

(4) He or she performs the blood gas analysis under the direction and supervision of the physician and surgeon.

(5) He or she submits the analysis for interpretation to the physician and surgeon under whose direction and supervision he or she performed the analysis.

(b) After September 1, 1997, any person may perform a blood gas analysis classified as of high complexity under CLIA, if, in addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), he or she has earned an associate degree related to pulmonary function from an accredited institution as determined by HCFA pursuant to CLIA.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as authorizing any individual, not otherwise authorized, to withdraw blood.

(d) Nothing contained in this section is applicable to a person licensed as a respiratory care practitioner under Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700). Those persons are authorized to perform those functions set forth in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1246.

(a) (1) On and after the effective date of the regulations specified in paragraph (2), any unlicensed person employed by a clinical laboratory performing the duties described in this section shall possess a valid and current certification as a certified phlebotomy technician issued by the department.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations for certification by January 1, 2001, as a certified phlebotomy technician that shall include all of the following:

(A) The applicant shall hold a valid, current certification as a phlebotomist issued by a national accreditation agency approved by the department, and shall submit proof of that certification when applying for certification
 pursuant to this section.

(B) An applicant with fewer than 1,040 hours of work experience shall complete education, training, and experience requirements as specified by regulations that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(i) At least 40 hours of didactic instruction.

(ii) At least 40 hours of practical instruction.

(iii) At least 50 successful venipunctures.

(C) An applicant who has at least 1,040 hours of work experience that includes at least 50 successful venipunctures shall complete at least 20 hours of didactic instruction, as specified in regulations adopted by the department.

(D) Each certified
 phlebotomy technician shall complete at least three hours per year or six hours every two years of continuing education or training. The department shall consider a variety of programs in determining the programs that meet the continuing education or training requirement.

(E) The applicant has been found to be competent in phlebotomy by a licensed physician and surgeon or person licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(F) The applicant works under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon, licensed registered nurse, or person licensed under this chapter, or the designee of a licensed physician and surgeon or the designee of a person licensed under this chapter.

(3) A certified phlebotomy technician may collect blood through a peripheral venous catheter if all of the following are met:

(A) The blood collection procedure is performed in a facility licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The blood collection procedures or protocols are developed and approved by the facility’s supervising physician and surgeon or licensed clinical laboratory director and approved by the licensed facility.

(C) The certified phlebotomy technician has received a minimum of three hours of training by the supervising physician and surgeon or their delegate in the proper procedures to be employed when collecting blood through a peripheral venous catheter.

(i) Training in the blood collection procedure through a peripheral venous catheter shall be conducted according to standardized training procedures developed
 and approved by the facility’s supervising physician and surgeon or licensed clinical laboratory director. The facility shall make these standardized procedures available to the department upon request.

(ii) The instructor shall document the certified phlebotomy technician’s successful completion of training. The facility shall maintain and make available to the department, upon request, documentation of training completed by a certified phlebotomy technician pursuant to this paragraph.

(D) The certified phlebotomy technician performs the blood collection procedure under the supervision of a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000). Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the physician and surgeon may only delegate the supervision duties in this subparagraph to a registered nurse. A physician and surgeon or a registered nurse may restrict or limit a
 certified phlebotomy technician’s ability to collect blood from a patient’s peripheral venous catheter.

(E) The certified phlebotomy technician performs the blood collection procedure using a device or devices approved by the licensed facility and the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(F) This paragraph does not authorize the certified phlebotomy technician to manage, stop, or restart a patient’s active intravenous infusion or insert or remove a peripheral intravenous catheter.

(4) Paragraph (3) does not authorize a certified phlebotomy technician to withdraw blood through a peripherally inserted central catheter or central venous catheter.

(5) The department shall adopt regulations establishing standards for approving training programs
 designed to prepare applicants for certification pursuant to this section. The standards shall ensure that these programs meet the state’s minimum education and training requirements for comparable programs.

(6) The department shall adopt regulations establishing standards for approving national accreditation agencies to administer certification examinations and tests pursuant to this section.

(7) The department shall charge fees for application for and renewal of the certificate authorized by this section pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1300.

(b) (1) (A) A certified phlebotomy technician may perform venipuncture or skin puncture to obtain a specimen for nondiagnostic tests assessing the health of an individual, for insurance purposes, provided that the technician works under the general supervision of a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000). The physician and surgeon may delegate the general supervision duties to a registered nurse or a person licensed under this chapter, but shall remain responsible for ensuring that all those duties and responsibilities are properly performed. The physician and surgeon shall make available to the department, upon request, records maintained documenting when a certified phlebotomy technician has performed venipuncture or skin puncture pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) As used in this paragraph, general supervision requires the supervisor of the technician to determine that the